North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 10A. Litter Prevention Account.

§ 136-125.1.
Litter Prevention Account.

There is established under the control and direction of the Department of Transportation the Litter Prevention Account. The Account shall be a nonreverting special revenue account within the Highway Fund and shall consist of moneys credited to the Account under G.S. 20-81.12(b67) from the sale of litter prevention special registration plates. The Department of Transportation shall allocate the funds in the Account to reduce litter in the State.

History.

2000-159, s. 9(a).

§ 136-125.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 28.35(a), effective July 1, 2011.

History.

2000-159, s. 9(a); repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 28.35(a), effective July 1, 2011.